src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
!! # The Erzya morphophonological/twolc rules file 

!! This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-myv/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

!! ## Alphabet
Alphabet
а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я  
А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я

ӓ Ӓ ҥ Ҥ і І ѳ Ѳ !!≈ @CODE@ Pre-Soviet 1930s letters 
ѝ а̀


! Nominal stem vowels that alternate 
! work with "+VLoss" and "+NoVLoss" tags
!
!У2:о
!У2:0
!И2:е
!И2:ь
!И2:0

!! ## Special letters in the root that might be useful in dialect research and etymology later
Ь3:0  !!= * **@CODE@** арсемс:арсе  arśems  vs арсемс:арЬ3се  aŕśems 
Ӓ3:э  !!= * **@CODE@** эрямс:Ӓ3ря 
Ӓ4:е  !!= * **@CODE@** пелемс:пӒ4ль
%^Ӓ3:Э  !!= * @CODE@ ^Ӓ3 :Э
%^Ӓ4:Е  !!= * @CODE@ ^Ӓ4 :Е
%^ӓ3:э  !!= * @CODE@ эрямс:^ӓ3ря
%^ӓ4:е  !!= * @CODE@ пелемс:п^ӓ4ль

%^Ь2ZERO:0  !!= * **@CODE@** removes stem-final soft sign

!Suffix final variant vowel for hard vs soft
!%{ЬØ%}:ь !
%{ЬØ%}:0 !

! verbal stem consonant that appear in PretI 3sg
!Т1:0 !

%^TD:0 ! used with тано/тадо types

! derivational suffix protovowel with "o" and "a" 
!realisation  in deverbal noun ending
А1:а !

! conjugational suffix protovowels 
!showing "a" vs "я" and "ы" vs "и" alternation
!%{АЯ%}:а !А2
%{АЯ%}:я !А2
!%{иы%}:и !
%{иы%}:ы !

! derivational suffix protovowel  "mo" and "me"
О1:е !
О1:э !
О1:о !
О1:0 !

! variation in э о 0 inessive, elative; this is the hard/broad s
%{оэØ%}:о 
%{оэØ%}:э
%{оэØ%}:0

! derivational suffix protovowel  аволь аволинь
%{ое%}:е
%{ое%}:о


! derivation suffix-initial archivowel 
%{оеэØ%}:е
%{оеэØ%}:э
%{оеэØ%}:о
%{оеэØ%}:0
! for dialect suffix-initial archivowel
%{уиыØ%}:у
%{уиыØ%}:и
%{уиыØ%}:ы
! raising e:i, o:u before a in NW
%^RegrRaise:0         !! идиса, идима
%^Break:0	      !! ашоян disallow о:0

! suffix-internal archivowel
%{оеэ%}:е	  !! вт%{оеэ%}мО1
%{оеэ%}:э
%{оеэ%}:о


! stem-final archivowels панго/тинге
%{ОØ%}:0 !!≈ * _@CODE@_ Stem-final archiphoneme панго
%{ЕØ%}:ь !!≈ * _@CODE@_ Stem-final archiphoneme тинге
%{ЕØ%}:0 !!≈ * _@CODE@_ Stem-final archiphoneme тинге

Е3:е ! тне тнэ не нэ
%^H:0 !!≈ * _@CODE@_ used with stems in ч, ш, ж for hard plurals

! for ablative
%{дт%}:д !!≈ * _@CODE@_ in ablative
%{дт%}:т !!≈ * _@CODE@_ in ablative

! clitic proto consonant
Г1:г !
Г1:к !
Г1:0 !

! clitic for subnorm %^Д1ак
%^Д1:д ! %^Д1ак


! Prolative Ga
Г2:г !
Г2:к !
Г2:в !


! Imperative clitic proto consonant
Г4:г !
Г4:к !
Г4:0 !
!Replace these with "G1" but apply stem final "K4" to
!




! imperative suffix
%{КТ%}:к !
%{КТ%}:т !

!

! connegative suffix rendering vowel
! панемс пань%>%{оеэØ%}К3 : пан00е0
К3:0 !

! Stem final on Imperative Verbs
!К4:0 !

! Diminutive in ке and не нэ Н1е
Н1:к
Н1:н

! Harmony
 %{frontHard%}:0   !!= @CODE@ — front harmony hard
 %{frontSoft%}:0   !!= @CODE@ — front harmony soft
 %{back%}:0   !!= @CODE@ — back harmony
 %{backHard%}:0   !!= @CODE@ — back harmony
 %{dialM%}:0   !!= * @CODE@ — for Shoksha and Drakino Dial/M morphology
 %{ichPat%}:0  !!= * @CODE@ — for triggering colloquial partonymic forms 

%^CnsRM:0      !!= * @CODE@ — Remove consonant

! Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):
 »7     ! »
 «7     ! «
 %[%>%] ! >
 %[%<%] ! <


! Some verbs need a marker for vowel placement
!Used before Conjuntive ending
!V1:е !
!V1:э !2012-03-13 look to О1:
!V1:о !
! I2 and U2 adjectives and nouns need this with their "t" and "s"
!V2:0 

TLoss:0
SLoss:0
KLoss:0
VLoss:0
%^WLoss:0
NoVLoss:0

%^OldAE:0	!!= @CODE@ — This allows Ӓ4 and Ӓ3 to be realized as я 
%^NoLinkVow:0 !!= @CODE@ — No linking vowel is used only after consonants for error
%^SoftRetain:0 !!= * @CODE@ — The soft sign is not lost when adding -тне
%^HardNoDent:0 !!= * @CODE@ — Hard non-dent followed by -тнэ потоктнэсэ

— ! emdash
%- !Hyphen with constructions like "-buti"
%>
%<
#
« »

;


Sets

Vows = а о у ы э я ё ю и е %^ӓ3 %^ӓ4 %^Ӓ3 %^Ӓ4 Ӓ3 Ӓ4 
       А О У Ы Э Я Ё Ю И Е ;

SurfVows = а о у ы э я ё ю и е
       А О У Ы Э Я Ё Ю И Е ;

verbStemVows = а о э я ё е 
	       А О Э Я Ё Е ;
verbStemVowStrong = а о э я ё е 
		    А О Э Я Ё Е ;
noGlideVow = а о у ы э 
	     А О У Ы Э ;
glideVow = я ё ю и е 
	   Я Ё Ю И Е ;
BTV = а о у я ё ю 
      А О У Я Ё Ю ; ! Back Trigger Vowels
FTV = ы и е э %^ӓ3 %^ӓ4 %^Ӓ3 %^Ӓ4 Ӓ3 Ӓ4 ӓ
      Ы И Е Э Ӓ ; ! Front Trigger Vowels

Cns = б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ 
      Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ ;
NPC = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш 
      Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш ; ! Nonpalatal Consonants
CnsVoiced = б в г д ж з й л м н р 
	    Б В Г Д Ж З Й Л М Н Р ;
CnsVoicedDent = д з л н р 
	      	Д З Л Н Р ;
CnsVoicedNonDent = б в г ж й м 
		   Б В Г Ж Й М ;
CnsVoiceless = к п с т ф х ц ч ш щ 
	       К П С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ ;
CnsVoicelessDent = с т ц 
		   С Т Ц ;
CnsVoicelessNonDent = к п ф х ч ш щ 
		      К П Ф Х Ч Ш Щ ;
CnsNonDent = б в г ж к м п ф х ч ш щ 
	     Б В Г Ж К М П Ф Х Ч Ш Щ ;
CnsNonDentShib = б в г к м п ф х 
	         Б В Г К М П Ф Х ;

CnsSoftNonDent = й Й щ Щ ;
CnsHardNonDent = ж ч ш 
	       	 Ж Ч Ш ;
CnsDent = д з л н р с т ц 
	  Д З Л Н Р С Т Ц  ;
CnsDentNoL = д з н р с т ц 
	     Д З Н Р С Т Ц  ;

Letters = Vows Cns ь ъ Ь Ъ ;

HarmDummies = %{back%} %{backHard%}  %{frontSoft%} %{frontHard%}  ;

Definitions

! Front Trigger Consonants (less ль)
FTC = [ й: | д ь: | з ь: | н ь: | р ь: | с ь: | т ь: | ц ь: ] ;

! All Consonants
AC = [ FTC | л ь: | NPC | щ ] ;

! Left Front Context Soft
LFCS = [ :FTV [ %> | :0 | AC ]* CnsNonDent | :FTV [ %> | :0 | AC ]* FTC |  BTV FTC AC* CnsNonDent  | FTC | л ь: ] ;

!асфальт, Вольф, пульс, вальс, Шульц, Адольф, Хальт, Гольд, радикульт, Бухенвальд, Флангервальд, Линкольн, Гальч, бульк, скульп
! Left Front Context Hard
LFCH = [ :FTV AC* CnsDent | [LFCS ( %{frontHard%}: | %{frontSoft%}: ) | :FTV AC* ( %{frontHard%}: | %{frontSoft%}: )] %> з | BTV FTC  AC* CnsDent+ | [ BTV л ь [ к с ] ] ] ;

! Front Trigger
FT = [ LFCS | LFCH | л ь: | :FTV ] ; 
! This should be followed by a morpheme boundary marker %>

LFCHMore =  [ :FTV | FTC | л ь: ]  %> [ %{оеэØ%}: н з | с ( т ) ] ;
! [ LFCS | LFCH | :FTV ]  \[ # | :BTV | BTV: ]* %> [ [ %{оеэØ%}:е | %{оеэØ%}:0 ] м [ с | с т ] | [ %{оеэØ%}:е | %{оеэØ%}:0 ] ( н ) з | н д з| н д| з | с | с т ] ;
!


! LEFT BACK TRIGGER CONTEXT
BackTriggerContextCns = [ :BTV [ %> | %{back%}: | %{backHard%}: | :NPC | %{оеэØ%}:0 ]* NPC ] ;
![ :BTV [ %> | :NPC | %{оеэØ%}:0 ]* NPC ] ;

! Left Back Context
LBC = [# [Cns: (ь) ]* :BTV NPC* | :BTV \[ # | :FTV | FTV: | ь: | й: ]* |:BTV л ь [ ф | м | т | д | с | к %> | ч | ш | ц | п | н] ]  ;
!   [ :BTV ( %> %{оеэØ%}:0 ) NPC* ( %> )  :NPC+ |BTV л ь [ ф | т | д ] ]  ;


NoFront = [ %>  | :BTV | BTV: | :NPC | О1: | %{оеэØ%}: ]* ;

LBCCns = [ :BTV [ \[ # | :FTV | FTV: | ь: | й: | :Vows ]* :NPC |:BTV %> CnsDent |  л ь [ ф | т | д ] ]]  ;
!LBCCns = LBC \[ # | FT | :FTV | FTC | л ь: | ь: | й: ]* :NPC+ ;


HardBackNoDentShib = [BTV [ NPC ]* CnsNonDentShib] ;
SoftNoDentShib = [FTV [б | в | г | й | к | м | п | ф | х | щ | ь | д ь | з ь | л ь | н ь | р ь | с ь | т ь | ц ь]* CnsNonDentShib] ;


PossX = [ м | н %{ЬØ%}: | т %{ЬØ%}: | н т %{ЬØ%}: | ( н ) з %{оэØ%}: | н %{оеэ%}: к | м О1: к | н к | ( н ) с т | с к ] ;

CaseX = [ с ь: | [ н | с ] т ь | [ н | с ] т е н ь | н е н ь | %{дт%}: О1: | д: %{оеэ%}: | с ( т ) О1: | з | с | в | к с | Г2: а | в: т %{оеэ%}: м О1: |  ш к а | н е: | н е: к | н ь: ] ;

CasePossX = [ т е [ т | н ] ь | н с т [ О1: | э н ь ] | з %> %{оеэØ%}: PossX ] ;

NoAE = [ \[ Ӓ3: | Ӓ4: | %^ӓ3: | %^ӓ4: | %^Ӓ3: | %^Ӓ4: | .#. ] ] ;

InfX = [ м с | м О1: | м А1: | м [д|%{дт%}:] О1: | м г а | м с О1: | м с т О1: | з ь: ] ;

ConjX = [ ( з ) м а к | ( з ) м а м | ( з ) м и з ь | н з а т | с с О1: | з О1: | с т | з т | %{КТ%}: %{ЬØ%}: | К3: | [д|%{дт%}:] О1: | (в: ( О1: ) ) л ь: ( т ь | с е ) | (в: ( О1: ) ) л и [[ н | т | т ( и | е ) н ] ь | д е | н [ е | и ] к | н к | з ь: | к | я | ( н ) з е | н з [ е | и ] т ь | [ м | д ] [ и | е ] з ь | м [ и | е ] [ м | к ]  ] | т с ( т ) ь   ] ;
Back =  :* [ :BTV \[ :FTV | :й | :ь  ]* ( л ь ) [NPC]]  ;
! Word-final elements
WFE = [ [ PossX | CaseX | CasePossX  | ConjX | т н е: ] [  #  | %> [  (%-) Г1: | Г4: | :Cns ] |  %- ]  | InfX |  # | %> [  (%-) Г1: | Г4: | :Cns ] |  %- ] ;

SIVV = [ PossX | InfX | м с (т) %{оэØ%}: | м (к) а | в | н е н ь | т е н ь | т е т ь | н с т э н ь | н с т %{оэØ%}: | н з а | н т е н ь | с т е н ь | л ь | л и | к с | ш к а | з т | з с | з а | з м | с | з  %>  %{оеэØ%}: | т ь: | н т ь: | н ь: | в:  О1:  л | т %> с ь | т %> с т ь | К3: | [д|%{дт%}:] О1: | с ь ] ;
! Suffix-Initial Variable Vowel



Rules


!Changes in the stem vowels before "10", "20", "30" and "60"
"verbStemVowStrong:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 X:Y <=> [ Cns | Vows | Г2: ] _ ( HarmDummies: )  %> [%{АЯ%}:я|%{АЯ%}:а [ н | т ]| %{иы%}:] ;
!                   Cns  _ К4:0 %>  %{иы%}: ;
		   _ в: и: ч %{ichPat%}:0 ;
          where X in (а о э ы у я ё е и ю)
                Y in (0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0) matched ;

!!€ цёра%>%{АЯ%}н
!!€ цёр0%>ан


"Ӓ3 Ӓ4 as я"
!! **@RULENAME@**
Vx:я <=> _ \[ # ]* %^OldAE:0 ;
      where Vx in (%^ӓ3 %^ӓ4 %^Ӓ3 %^Ӓ4 Ӓ3 Ӓ4) ;

! Deverbal noun in ОмА
"A1:o"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
А1:о <=>  [ а |я ] ( HarmDummies: ) %> %{оеэØ%}:0  м  _ ;
!!€ яка%>%{оеэØ%}мА1
!!€ яка%>0мо
!!$ яка%>%{оеэØ%}мА1
!!$ яка%>0ма

"Y2:yi"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{иы%}:и <=> [ я:0 | ё:0 | е:0 | ю:0 | ь: | й: | CnsNonDent (noGlideVow:0)] ( HarmDummies: ) %> _ ;


"%{оеэ%}:е"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{оеэ%}:е <=> 
         [ LFCS | FTC | л ь: | :FTV ] (%{frontSoft%}:) %> [в:0 | в ] т _ м О1: ;
         :FTV (%{frontSoft%}: ) %> %{оеэØ%}:0  н  _ к  ;
         [ %{оеэØ%}:е | %{оеэØ%}:э ]  н  _ к  ;
!! неемс+V+Ger+Ill+PxPl1: --see/nähdä--
!!€ ней%>%{оеэØ%}мО1%>%{оеэØ%}з%>%{оеэØ%}н%{оеэ%}к
!!€ не0%>еме%>0з%>энек

"%{оеэ%}:о"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{оеэ%}:о <=> 
         [ LBC (%{back%}: |%{backHard%}: )  %> | :BTV ( %> ) ] в: т _ м О1: ;
!! псака+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N+SP+Tra+Indef: **cat/kissa**
!!€ псака%>втО1мО1%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%}%>кс
!!€ псака%>втомо%>0нзо%>кс
        [ LBC (%{back%}: |%{backHard%}: ) %> | :BTV (%{back%}: |%{backHard%}: ) ( %> ( %{оеэØ%}:0 | %{оеэØ%}:о )) ] [ м | н ] _ к ;


"%{оеэ%}:э"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{оеэ%}:э <=> 
          LFCH (%{frontHard%}:) %> в: т _ м О1:  ;
          LFCH (%{frontHard%}:) %> н _ к  ;


"%{оеэØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{оеэØ%}:0 <=> :Vows (HarmDummies:) %> _  ;
               :Cns (HarmDummies:) %> %^NoLinkVow: _  ;
               в (HarmDummies:) %>  %^WLoss: %> _ в:0 ( %{ое%}: ) л ;
"%{оеэØ%}:е"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{оеэØ%}:е <=> LFCS ( %{frontSoft%}: ) %> _  ;
!! панемс+V+Ind+ConNeg: **drive/ajaa**
!!€ пань%>%{оеэØ%}К3
!!€ пан0%>е0
           [ ш | ж] %{frontSoft%}: %> _  ;
	   щ (%{frontSoft%}:)  %> _  ;
   [ LFCS | :FTV | ь: ]  ( %{frontSoft%}: ) %> %{оеэØ%}: в т  %{ЬØ%}:  %>  _  ;
        
!! вадемс+V+Der/Ovt+Prc/Telic+Sg+Nom+Def: **the greased one/**
!!€ вадь>{оеэØ}вт{ЬØ}>{оеэØ}сь
!!€ вад0>евт0>есь
	   
"%{оеэØ%}:э"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{оеэØ%}:э <=> LFCH ( %{frontHard%}: ) %> _ ;
               LFCS (%{frontSoft%}:) (%> %^NoLinkVow: %>|%> %^NoLinkVow: | %>) з %> _ ;
               [:FTV [д |з |л |н |р] |й: | д ь: | з ь: | н ь: | р ь: | л ь:] (%{frontSoft%}:) [%> %^NoLinkVow: %>|%> %^NoLinkVow: | %>] з %> _ ;
!! кев+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: **rock/kivi**
!!€ к^ӓ4в{frontSoft}>з>{оеэØ}т{ЬØ}
!!€ кев0>з>эть
!!€ к^ӓ4в{frontSoft}>{оеэØ}з>{оеэØ}т{ЬØ}
!!€ кев0>ез>эть
          :FTV  ( %{frontSoft%}: ) %> ( %{оеэØ%}:0 ) з %> _ ;
!!€ пильге%{frontSoft%}%>%{оеэØ%}з%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ пильге0%>0з%>эть

!   LFCH (%{frontHard%}:) %> [ с ( т ) | [ %{оеэØ%}:э |  %{оеэØ%}:0 ] з | %{оеэØ%}:э н   з | %{оеэØ%}:э м [ с | с т ] ] _ [  (%^OldAE:0) # |  %- | %> [ (%-) Г1: | %{оеэØ%}:0 | :Cns ] ]  ;
!  [LFCS  (%{frontSoft%}:) %>  с ( т ) |[ :FTV %> %{оеэØ%}:0 | %{оеэØ%}:э | %{оеэØ%}:е ] [ (н)   з | м [ с | с т ] ]] _ [  (%^OldAE:0) # |  %- | %> [ (%-) Г1: | %{оеэØ%}:0 | :Cns ] ]  ;
